Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.680

Subdividing and platting.

The planning agency shall review all proposed land plats and subdivisions and make recommendations to the board thereon with reference to approving, or recommending any modifications necessary to assure conformance to the general purposes of the comprehensive plan and to standards and specifications established by state law or local controls.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.680. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 68.]